Hawaii statutes.
PART VI.
HIV INFECTION, ARC, AND AIDS

Note

Part heading amended by L 1988, c 290, §1.

Cross References

Informed consent for testing or disclosure, see §325-16.

Quality assurance standards for HIV antibody testing, see
§325-17.

§325-101 Confidentiality of records and
information. (a) The records of any person that indicate that a person
has a human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) infection, AIDS related complex (ARC),
or acquired immune deficiency syndrome (AIDS), which are held or maintained by
any state agency, health care provider or facility, physician, osteopathic
physician, laboratory, clinic, blood bank, third party payor, or any other
agency, individual, or organization in the State shall be strictly
confidential. For the purposes of this part, the term "records"
shall be broadly construed to include all communication that identifies any
individual who has HIV infection, ARC, or AIDS. This information shall not be
released or made public upon subpoena or any other method of discovery. Notwithstanding
any other provision to the contrary, release of the records protected under
this part shall be permitted under the following circumstances:

(1) Release is made to the department of health in
order that it may comply with federal reporting requirements imposed on the
State. The department shall ensure that personal identifying information from
these records is protected from public disclosure;

(2) Release is made of the records, or of specific
medical or epidemiological information contained therein, with the prior
written consent of the person or persons to whom the records pertain;

(3) Release is made to medical personnel in a medical
emergency only to the extent necessary to protect the health, life, or
well-being of the named party;

(4) Release is made from a physician or osteopathic
physician licensed pursuant to chapter 453 to the department of health to
inform the sexual or needle sharing contact of an HIV seropositive patient
where:

(A) There is reason for the physician or
osteopathic physician to believe that the contact is or has been at risk of HIV
transmission as a result of the index patient having engaged in conduct which
is likely to transmit HIV; and

(B) The index patient has first been counseled
by the physician or osteopathic physician of the need for disclosure and the
patient is unwilling to inform the contact directly or is unwilling to consent
to the disclosure of the index patient's HIV status by the physician, the osteopathic
physician, or the department of health; provided that the identity of the index
patient is not disclosed; and provided further that there is no obligation to
identify or locate any contact. Any determination by a physician or
osteopathic physician to disclose or withhold disclosure of an index patient's
sexual contacts to the department of health pursuant to this subsection which
is made in good faith shall not be subject to penalties under this part or
otherwise subject to civil or criminal liability for damages under the laws of
the State;

(5) Release is made by the department of health of
medical or epidemiological information from the records to medical personnel,
appropriate county and state agencies, blood banks, plasma centers, organ and
tissue banks, schools, preschools, day care centers, or county or district
courts to enforce this part and to enforce rules adopted by the department
concerning the control and treatment of HIV infection, ARC, and AIDS, or to the
sexual or needle sharing contacts of an HIV seropositive index patient for purposes
of contact notification as provided in paragraph (4); provided that the
identity of the index patient, if known, shall not be disclosed; provided
further that release of information under this paragraph shall only be made by
confidential communication to a designated individual charged with compliance
with this part;

(6) Release of a child's records is made to the
department of human services for the purpose of enforcing chapters 350 and 587A;

(7) Release of a child's records is made within the department
of human services and to child protective services team consultants under
contract to the department of human services for the purpose of enforcing and
administering chapters 350 and 587A on a need to know basis pursuant to a
written protocol to be established and implemented, in consultation with the
director of health, by the director of human services;

(8) Release of a child's records is made by employees
of the department of human services authorized to do so by the protocol
established in paragraph (7) to a natural parent of a child who is the subject
of the case when the natural parent is a client in the case, the guardian ad
litem of the child, the court, each party to the court proceedings, and also to
an adoptive or a prospective adoptive parent, an individual or an agency with
whom the child is placed for twenty-four hour residential care, and medical
personnel responsible for the care or treatment of the child. When a release
is made to a natural parent of the child, it shall be with appropriate
counseling as required by section 325-16. In no event shall proceedings be
initiated against a child's natural parents for claims of child abuse under
chapter 350 or harm to a child or to affect parental rights under chapter 587A
solely on the basis of the HIV seropositivity of a child or the child's natural
parents;

(9) Release is made to the patient's health care
insurer to obtain reimbursement for services rendered to the patient; provided
that release shall not be made if, after being informed that a claim will be
made to an insurer, the patient is afforded the opportunity to make the
reimbursement directly and actually makes the reimbursement;

(10) Release is made by the patient's health care
provider to another health care provider for the purpose of continued care or
treatment of the patient;

(11) Release is made pursuant to a court order, after
an in camera review of the records, upon a showing of good cause by the party
seeking release of the records;

(12) Disclosure by a physician or osteopathic
physician, on a confidential basis, of the identity of a person who is HIV
seropositive and who also shows evidence of tuberculosis infection, to a person
within the department of health as designated by the director of health for
purposes of evaluating the need for or the monitoring of tuberculosis
chemotherapy for the person and the person's contacts who are at risk of
developing tuberculosis; or

(13) Release is made for the purpose of complying with
sections 325-16.5 and 801D-4(b). Nothing in this section shall be construed to
prohibit a victim to whom information is released pursuant to section 325-16.5
from requesting the release of information by a physician, osteopathic
physician, or HIV counselor to a person with whom the victim shares a
privileged relationship recognized by chapter 626; provided that prior to such
release, the person to whom the information is to be released shall be required
to sign a notice of HIV status disclosure advising them of the confidentiality
provisions regarding HIV test results and the penalties for unlawful disclosure
to any person other than a designated physician, osteopathic physician, or HIV
counselor.

As used in this part, unless the context
requires otherwise:

"Medical emergency" means any
disease-related situation that threatens life or limb.

"Medical personnel" means any health
care provider in the State, as provided in section 323D-2, who deals directly
or indirectly with the identified patient or the patient's contacts, and
includes hospital emergency room personnel, the staff of the communicable
disease division of the department of health, and any other department
personnel as designated by the director.

(b) Recording or maintaining information
protected under this part in a separate portion of an individual's file which
is clearly designated as confidential shall not be construed as a breach per se
of that individual's confidentiality.

(c) No person shall be compelled to consent to
the release of information protected under this part or to disclose whether the
person has been tested for the presence of HIV infection in order to obtain or
maintain housing, employment, or education.

(d) Any person who receives or comes into
possession of any record or information released or disclosed pursuant to
subsection (a) shall be subject to the same obligation of confidentiality as
the party from whom the record or information was received. [L 1986, c 161, pt
of §1; am L 1987, c 238, §1; am L 1988, c 290, §§2, 3; am L 1989, c 377, §1; am
L 1991, c 141, §2; am L 1992, c 162, §1; am L 1998, c 238, §4; am L 2009, c 11,
§38; am L 2010, c 135, §7]

Cross References

Advisory committees for infected health care workers, see
§325-18.

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next